Florida, session 2026, SB810.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 34 35 Section 1.âSubsection (1), paragraph (c) of subsection (4), 36 and paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 943.059, Florida 37 Statutes, are amended, subsection (7) is added to that section, 38 and paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of that section is 39 reenacted, to read: 40 943.059âCourt-ordered sealing of criminal history records.â 41 (1)âELIGIBILITY.âA person is eligible to petition a court 42 to seal a criminal history record when: 43 (a)âThe criminal history record is not ineligible for 44 court-ordered sealing under s. 943.0584. 45 (b)1.âThe person has not been adjudicated guilty of, or 46 adjudicated delinquent for committing, any of the acts stemming 47 from the arrest or alleged criminal activity to which the 48 petition to seal pertains; or 49 2.âThe petition to seal pertains to a misdemeanor offense 50 that the person was adjudicated guilty of and such misdemeanor 51 offense was not a violent offense; a misdemeanor offense of 52 domestic violence, as defined in s. 741.28; or a misdemeanor 53 violation of s. 316.193, s. 741.29, s. 741.31, s. 784.046, s. 54 784.047, s. 784.048, s. 784.0487, s. 784.049, s. 800.02, or s. 55 800.03. 56 (c)(b)âThe person has never, before the date the 57 application for a certificate of eligibility is filed, been 58 adjudicated guilty in this state of a criminal offense other 59 than an offense eligible for sealing under subparagraph (b)2., 60 or been adjudicated delinquent in this state for committing any 61 felony or any of the following misdemeanor offenses, unless the 62 record of such adjudication of delinquency has been expunged 63 pursuant to s. 943.0515: 64 1.âAssault, as defined in s. 784.011; 65 2.âBattery, as defined in s. 784.03; 66 3.âAssault on a law enforcement officer, a firefighter, or 67 other specified officers, as defined in s. 784.07(2)(a); 68 4.âCarrying a concealed weapon, as defined in s. 790.01(2); 69 5.âOpen carrying of a weapon, as defined in s. 790.053; 70 6.âUnlawful possession or discharge of a weapon or firearm 71 at a school-sponsored event or on school property, as defined in 72 s. 790.115; 73 7.âUnlawful use of destructive devices or bombs, as defined 74 in s. 790.1615(1); 75 8.âUnlawful possession of a firearm by a minor, as defined 76 in s. 790.22(5); 77 9.âExposure of sexual organs, as defined in s. 800.03; 78 10.âArson, as defined in s. 806.031(1); 79 11.âPetit theft, as defined in s. 812.014(3); 80 12.âNeglect of a child, as defined in s. 827.03(1)(e); or 81 13.âCruelty to animals, as defined in s. 828.12(1). 82 (c)âThe person has not been adjudicated guilty of, or 83 adjudicated delinquent for committing, any of the acts stemming 84 from the arrest or alleged criminal activity to which the 85 petition to seal pertains. 86 (d)âThe person is no longer serving the sentence or under 87 court supervision applicable to any the disposition of arrest or 88 alleged criminal activity to which the petition to seal 89 pertains. 90 (e)âThe person has never secured a prior sealing or 91 expunction of a criminal history record under this section, s. 92 943.0585, former s. 893.14, former s. 901.33, or former s. 93 943.058 which is related to an offense for which the person was 94 adjudicated guilty. 95 (2)âCERTIFICATE OF ELIGIBILITY.âBefore petitioning the 96 court to seal a criminal history record, a person seeking to 97 seal a criminal history record must apply to the department for 98 a certificate of eligibility for sealing. The department shall 99 adopt rules relating to the application for and issuance of 100 certificates of eligibility for sealing. 101 (a)âThe department shall issue a certificate of eligibility 102 for sealing to a person who is the subject of a criminal history 103 record if that person: 104 1.âSatisfies the eligibility criteria in paragraphs (1)(a) 105 (e) and is not ineligible for court-ordered sealing under s. 106 943.0584. 107 2.âHas submitted to the department a certified copy of the 108 disposition of charge to which the petition pertains. 109 3.âRemits a $75 processing fee to the department for 110 placement in the Department of Law Enforcement Operating Trust 111 Fund, unless the executive director waives such fee. 112 (4)âCOURT AUTHORITY.â 113 (c)âThe court may order the sealing of a criminal history 114 record pertaining to one adjudication of guilt arrest or one 115 incident of alleged criminal activity only, except the court may 116 order the sealing of a criminal history record pertaining to 117 more than one adjudication of guilt arrest if the additional 118 adjudications of guilt arrests directly relate to the original 119 arrest, original incident of criminal activity, or original 120 adjudication of guilt. If the court intends to order the sealing 121 of records pertaining to such additional adjudications of guilt 122 arrests, such intent must be specified in the order. A criminal 123 justice agency may not seal any record pertaining to such 124 additional adjudications of guilt arrests if the order to seal 125 does not articulate the intention of the court to seal a record 126 pertaining to more than one adjudication of guilt arrest. This 127 section does not prevent the court from ordering the sealing of 128 only a portion of a criminal history record pertaining to one 129 arrest or one incident of alleged criminal activity. 130 (6)âEFFECT OF ORDER.â 131 (b)âThe subject of the criminal history record sealed under 132 this section or under other provisions of law, including former 133 ss. 893.14, 901.33, and 943.058, may lawfully deny or fail to 134 acknowledge the arrests or adjudications of guilt covered by the 135 sealed record, except when the subject of the record: 136 1.âIs a candidate for employment with a criminal justice 137 agency; 138 2.âIs a defendant in a criminal prosecution; 139 3.âConcurrently or subsequently petitions for relief under 140 this section, s. 943.0583, or s. 943.0585; 141 4.âIs a candidate for admission to The Florida Bar; 142 5.âIs seeking to be employed or licensed by or to contract 143 with the Department of Children and Families, the Division of 144 Vocational Rehabilitation within the Department of Education, 145 the Agency for Health Care Administration, the Agency for 146 Persons with Disabilities, the Department of Health, the 147 Department of Elderly Affairs, or the Department of Juvenile 148 Justice or to be employed or used by such contractor or licensee 149 in a sensitive position having direct contact with children, the 150 disabled, or the elderly; 151 6.a.âIs seeking to be employed or licensed by, or contract 152 with, the Department of Education, a district unit under s. 153 1001.30, a special district unit under s. 1011.24, the Florida 154 School for the Deaf and the Blind under s. 1002.36, the Florida 155 Virtual School under s. 1002.37, a virtual instruction program 156 under s. 1002.45, a charter school under s. 1002.33, a hope 157 operator under s. 1002.333, an alternative school under s. 158 1008.341, a private or parochial school, or a local governmental 159 entity that licenses child care facilities; 160 b.âIs seeking to be employed or used by a contractor or 161 licensee under sub-subparagraph a.; or 162 c.âIs a person screened under s. 1012.467; 163 7.âIs attempting to purchase a firearm from a licensed 164 importer, licensed manufacturer, or licensed dealer and is 165 subject to a criminal history check under state or federal law; 166 8.âIs seeking to be licensed by the Division of Insurance 167 Agent and Agency Services within the Department of Financial 168 Services; 169 9.âIs seeking to be appointed as a guardian pursuant to s. 170 744.3125; or 171 10.âIs seeking to be licensed by the Bureau of License 172 Issuance of the Division of Licensing within the Department of 173 Agriculture and Consumer Services to carry a concealed weapon or 174 concealed firearm. This subparagraph applies only in the 175 determination of an applicantâs eligibility under s. 790.06. 176 (7)âWAITING PERIODS.â 177 (a)âIf a person has previously secured the sealing of a 178 criminal history record relating to an offense for which an 179 adjudication of guilt was withheld and the person seeks to seal 180 a subsequent criminal history record relating to an offense for 181 which an adjudication of guilt was withheld, the court may grant 182 the petition to seal the subsequent criminal history record if 183 the petitioner has maintained a conviction-free record in the 3 184 years after the date on which the court withheld an adjudication 185 of guilt for the offense to which the subsequent petition to 186 seal pertains. 187 (b)âIf the petitioner seeks to seal a criminal history 188 record for an offense for which he or she was adjudicated 189 guilty, the court may grant such petition if the petitioner has 190 maintained a conviction-free record in the 5 years after the 191 date on which the court adjudicated the person guilty. 192 193 For purposes of this subsection, the term âconvictionâ has the 194 same meaning as in s. 943.0584(1). 195 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.